dictionaries/uk/index.aff
SFX Z іслатися стелімося іслатися
SFX Z іслатися стелімось іслатися
SFX Z іслатися стелімся іслатися
SFX Z іслатися стеліться іслатися
SFX Z нутися ся [^аеєиіїоуя]нутися
SFX Z нутися шись [^аеєиіїоуя]нутися
SFX Z нутися шися [^аеєиіїоуя]нутися ###
SFX Z ітися уся удітися
SFX Z ітися усь удітися
SFX Z ітися ешся удітися
SFX Z ітися еться удітися
SFX Z ітися емося удітися
SFX Z ітися емось удітися
SFX Z ітися етеся удітися
SFX Z ітися етесь удітися
SFX Z ітися уться удітися
SFX Z ітися ися удітися
SFX Z ітися ись удітися
SFX Z ітися імося удітися
SFX Z ітися імось удітися
SFX Z ітися імся удітися
SFX Z ітися іться удітися
SFX Z ти ну тріти
SFX Z ти неш тріти
SFX Z ти не тріти
SFX Z ти немо тріти
SFX Z ти нете тріти
SFX Z ти нуть тріти
SFX Z ти нь тріти
SFX Z ти ньмо тріти
SFX Z ти ньте тріти
SFX Z тися нуся (^|[^у])дітися
SFX Z тися нусь (^|[^у])дітися
SFX Z тися нешся (^|[^у])дітися
SFX Z тися неться (^|[^у])дітися
SFX Z тися немося (^|[^у])дітися
SFX Z тися немось (^|[^у])дітися
SFX Z тися нетеся (^|[^у])дітися
SFX Z тися нетесь (^|[^у])дітися
SFX Z тися нуться (^|[^у])дітися
SFX Z тися нься (^|[^у])дітися
SFX Z тися ньмося (^|[^у])дітися
SFX Z тися ньмось (^|[^у])дітися
SFX Z тися ньтеся (^|[^у])дітися
SFX Z тися ньтесь (^|[^у])дітися
SFX Z тися йся [бвлп]итися
SFX Z тися йсь [бвлп]итися
SFX Z тися ймося [бвлп]итися
SFX Z тися ймось [бвлп]итися
SFX Z тися йтеся [бвлп]итися
SFX Z тися йтесь [бвлп]итися
SFX Z лити іллю [бвдз]лити
SFX Z лити іллєш [бвдз]лити
SFX Z лити іллє [бвдз]лити
SFX Z лити іллємо [бвдз]лити
SFX Z лити іллєте [бвдз]лити
SFX Z лити іллють [бвдз]лити
SFX Z іти и [пт]іти
SFX Z іти імо [пт]іти
SFX Z іти ім [пт]іти
SFX Z іти іть [пт]іти
SFX Z тися лася [^ус]тися
SFX Z тися лась [^ус]тися
SFX Z тися лося [^ус]тися
SFX Z тися лось [^ус]тися
SFX Z тися лися [^ус]тися
SFX Z тися лись [^ус]тися
SFX Z ітися ися [пт]ітися
SFX Z ітися ись [пт]ітися
SFX Z ітися імося [пт]ітися
SFX Z ітися імось [пт]ітися
SFX Z ітися імся [пт]ітися
SFX Z ітися іться [пт]ітися
SFX [ Y 13
SFX [ я ів [лрц]я
SFX [ е ів [лрц]е
SFX [ я ям [лрц]я
SFX [ е ям [лрц]е
SFX [ я ями [лрц]я
SFX [ е ями [лрц]е
SFX [ я ях [лрц]я
SFX [ е ях [лрц]е
SFX [ о а о
SFX [ о ів о
SFX [ о ам о
SFX [ о ами о
SFX [ о ах о
SFX \ Y 5
SFX \ 'я 'я м'я
SFX \ 'я 'їв м'я
SFX \ 'я 'ям м'я
SFX \ 'я 'ями м'я
SFX \ 'я 'ях м'я
