dictionaries/uk/index.dic
битися/Zyt
біополе/Q[
блякнути/Zyt
в'янути/Zyt
вбитися/Z
ввібрати/Z'
ввігнати/Z'
ввіссати/Z'
вгрузти/Z
вдатися/Z
вдітися/Z
вдягтися/Z
вибитися/Z
виблякнути/Z
видати/Z'
видістатися/Z
викиснути/Z
вим'я/Ra\
вимокти/Z
виникнути/Z
випочити/Z
висісти/Z
виснути/ZytX
виссати/Z'
вистигти/Z
витися/Zy
витягти/Zl
вихолонути/Z
вичахти/Z
вищезнути/Z
відбитися/Z
відвиснути/Z
відгудіти/Z
віддатися/Z
відібратися/Z
відігнатися/Z
відідратися/Z
відіпратися/Z
відквітнути/Z
відлити/Zl
відм'якнути/Z
відмерзти/Z
відпити/Zl
відпочити/Z
відсісти/Z
відстати/Z
відтати/Z
відтягтися/Z
віссати/Z
вклякнути/Z
влипнути/Z
влитися/Z
вмовкнути/Z
вмолоти/ZN
воскреснути/Z
впитися/Z^
вповитися/Z
всістися/Z
всохти/Z
встигти/Z
встряти/Z
втиснутися/Z
вторгнутися/Z
втягти/Z
вщухнути/Z
гамма-поле/Q[
геополе/Q[
гіркнути/Zyt
гнати/Zy'
городисько/Q[
гудіти/Zyt
дати/Z'
дістати/Z
діти/Z
добити/Zl
довидати/Z'
довитися/Z
додатися/Z
домолотися/Z
допитися/Z
дослати/X'Z
доссати/Z
достатися/Z
досягти/Z
дотиснути/Zl
дотягти/Z
дохнути/Zyt
енергополе/Q[
забагти/Z
забитися/Z
забрезкнути/Z
зав'язти/Z
завдати/Z'
завергти/Z
завити/ZlY
загаснути/Z
загрузти/Z
загускнути/Z
задати/Z'
задіти/Zl
задубти/Z
заквітнути/Z
заклякти/Z
залипнути/Z
замовкнути/Z
замокти/Z
запахнути/Z
заподіти/Zl
запосягти/Z
заприсягти/Z
запродати/Z'
запухнути/Z
заревіти/Z
заслабти/Z
засмагнути/Z
зассати/Z
застати/Z
застрягти/Z
засягти/Z
затерпнути/Z
затиснутися/Z
затухнути/Z
затягтися/Z
захолонути/Z
захрипнути/Z
захтіти/Z
зачахти/Z
збити/Zl
збліднути/Z
звергти/Z
звикнути/Z
звиснути/Z
звитися/Z
згіркнути/Z
здатися/Z
здохнути/Z
зібратися/Z
зігнати/Z'
зідратися/Z
злипнутися/Z
злитися/XLytZ
змерзнути/Z
змерзти/Z
змеркнути/Z
змерхти/Z
змовкти/Z
змолотися/Z
зодягти/Z
зостатися/Z
зсістися/Z
зсохнутися/Z
зсохтися/Z
зустрітися/Z
ікло/QST[
інфополе/Q[
інформполе/Q[
квітнути/Zyt
клякнути/ZytX
концептополе/Q[
м'якнути/Zyt
макрополе/QT[
медіаполе/QT[
медіа-поле/QT[
меживузля/Q[
меркнути/Zyt
міжвузля/Q[
мікрополе/Q[
мовкнути/Zyt
молотися/Zy
море/Q[
набитися/Z
набрякнути/Z
нав'язнути/Z
навити/Zl
надати/Z'
надбити/Zl
наддати/Z
надігнати/Z
надітися/Z
надпити/Zl
надсістися/Z
надягти/Z
нам'якнути/Z
намерзтися/Z
напити/Z
напосісти/Z
напухнути/Z
насісти/Z
наслати/X'Z
нассати/Z
настати/Z
натиснути/ZlN
натягтися/Z
недодати/Z'
недопитися/Z
никнути/ZX
оббити/Zl
обвикнути/Z
обвиснути/Z
обвитися/Z
обдатися/Z
обібратися/Z
обігнатися/Z
обідратися/Z
обіпратися/Z
облити/Zl
обм'якнути/Z
обпитися/Z
обриднути/Z
обсістися/Z
обстати/Z
обтиснути/ZlN
обтягти/Z
огиднути/Z
одбити/Zl
оддати/Z'
одігнати/Z'
одітися/Z
одпочити/Z
одягти/Z
оклякнути/Z
оповитися/Z
опочити/Z
осісти/Z
ослабнути/Z
осліпнути/Z
остигти/Z
осягти/Z
отягти/Z
охляти/Z
охрипнути/Z
перебити/Zl
перевдягти/Z
перевидати/Z'
перевиснути/Z
перевитися/Z
перегіркнути/Z
передати/Z'
передохнути/Z
передратися/Z
передягтися/Z
перездати/Z'
перезібрати/Z'
перемерзнути/Z
перемолотися/Z
переодягтися/Z
перепитися/Z
переповитися/Z
перепочити/Z
пересісти/Z
пересохнути/Z
перестати/Z
перестріти/Zl
перетиснути/ZNl
перетягтися/Z
перехотіти/Z
підбити/Zl
підвиснути/Z
підвитися/Z
піддатися/Z
підібрати/Z'
підігнати/Z'
підіслати/X'Z
підлити/Zl
підмерзти/Z
підпити/Z
підполе/Q[
підсісти/Z
підсохти/Z
підтиснути/ZNl
підтягти/Z
побити/Zl
побліднути/Z
пов'яти/Z
повиснути/Z
повитися/Z
погаснути/Z
поглухнути/Z
подати/Z'
подіти/Zl
подохнути/Z
пожухнути/Z
поклякнути/Z
поле/QT[
померкнути/Z
помокнути/Z
попити/Zl
поповити/ZX
попомерзнути/Z
попоревіти/Z
поревіти/Z
послабнути/Z
посмагнути/Z
посохти/Z
постати/Z
постигти/Z
потати/Z
потиснути/Z
потухнути/Z
потягтися/Z
похотіти/Z
пошерхнути/Z
прибити/Zl
прибліднути/Z
прив'янути/Z
привикнути/Z
пригіркнути/Z
придати/Z'
придатися/Z
прилипнути/Z
примерзти/Z
примеркти/Z
примовкнути/Z
принишкнути/Z
приодягти/Z
припочити/Z
припухнути/Z
присісти/Z
присохнути/Z
присохти/Z
приссати/Z
пристанути/Z
пристати/Z
пристигти/Z
присягтися/Z
притиснути/ZNl
притиснутися/Z
притрухнути/Z
притухнути/Z
притягти/Z
пришерхнути/Z
прищухнути/Z
пробити/Zl
провиснути/Z
прогіркнути/Z
прогудіти/Z
продатися/Z
прожовкнути/Z
прокиснути/Z
промокнути/Z
промолоти/ZM
проникнути/Z
пропити/Zl
пропитися/Z
проревіти/Z
просохти/Z
простигти/Z
простягти/Z
просякти/Z
протанути/Z
протиснути/ZNl
протухнути/Z
протягти/Z
протягтися/Z
прочахти/Z
пухнути/Zyt
ревіти/Zy
розбитися/Z
розбухнути/Z
розверзти/Z
розвитися/Z
роздати/Z'
роздатися/Z
роздягтися/Z
розібрати/Z'
розібратися/Z
розігнатися/Z
розідрати/Z'
розідратися/Z
розквітнути/Z
розкиснути/Z
розлити/Zl
розм'якнути/Z
розмерзтися/Z
розмокнути/Z
розмолотися/Z
розпити/Zl
розпитися/Z
розповитися/Z
розпродати/Z'
розпродатися/Z
розревітися/Z
розсістися/Z
розсохтися/Z
розтати/Z
розтиснути/ZNl
розтиснутися/Z
розтягтися/Z
розхотіти/Z
самовбитися/Z
скиснути/Z
скреснути/Z
скригнути/Z
слати/XytZ
слатися/XytZ
слизнути/ZX
сохнути/Zyt
спертися/Z
спитися/Z
сповити/Zl
сповитися/Z
сприсягтися/Z
спродати/Z'
спродатися/Z
спухнутися/Z
ссати/Zy
станути/Z
статися/Z
стверднути/Z
стерпнути/Z
стертися/Z
стигнути/Zyt
стиснути/ZNl
стихнути/Z
стріти/Z
стрітися/Z
стягти/Z
стягтися/Z
субполе/QT[
схолонути/Z
схрипнути/XZ
схуднути/Z
танути/Zyt
терпнути/Zyt
тиснути/ZytlN
тиснутися/Zy
тім'я/Ra\
трухнути/XZyt
тягти/Zy
тягтися/Zy
убитися/Z
увергнути/Zl
увергнутися/Z
увити/Zl
увитися/Z
увібрати/Z'
увігнати/Z'
увігнатися/Z
увіссати/Z
угрузти/Z
удати/Z
удатися/Z
удягтися/Z
укиснути/Z
уклякти/Z
умерзнути/Z
умовкнути/Z
умокнути/Zl
упити/Z^
упитися/Z^
уповити/Zl
усістися/Z
услати/Z'
услатися/Z
устати/Z
устигти/Z
устрягти/Z
утиснути/ZNl
утихнути/Z
утягти/Z
ущухнути/Z
хлянути/Zy
хляти/Zy
хотіти/Zyt
худнути/Zyt
чахнути/Zyt
шкарубнути/Zyt
щезнути/Z
